Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 29. Registers

§ 1321.
Form and contents of register.

With the approval of the State Board, the Secretary shall prescribe the content of school registers used to keep records of student enrollment and daily attendance and to obtain statistical and other information from teachers and school officers. Schools shall maintain an electronic system for recording enrollment and attendance.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 13

, § 1;

2013, No. 56

, § 8, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1322.
Transmission to superintendents and teachers.

Annually, in the month of June, the Secretary shall provide access to the school register. Superintendents shall ensure that school registrars and other staff have received the register and updated the current student information system at least 10 days prior to the beginning of the school year.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 56

, § 8, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1323.
Registrar’s duties.

The superintendent shall appoint a registrar for each school within the supervisory union. Pursuant to the school register, the registrar shall maintain the record of student enrollment, daily attendance, and other requested information and shall oversee transmission of student data to the Secretary on or before July 15 annually.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 56

, § 8, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 1324.
Superintendent’s duties.

At the end of the school year, the superintendent shall examine the register of each school, verify the accuracy of the information, and notify in writing the chair of the school board and the Secretary that the school register for the year is complete and accurate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 48

, § 12, eff. April 15, 1975;

1987, No. 137

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 61

, § 76, eff. June 16, 2001;

2003, No. 36

, § 10;

2009, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 6, 2010;

2013, No. 56

, § 8, eff. May 30, 2013.